Montana, session 2025, HB775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Repealer. Section 6, Chapter 126, Laws of 2017, is repealed.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 775
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 775, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 775
INTRODUCED BY K. WALSH
AN ACT REPEALING THE SUNSET DATE OF LAWS REGARDING JUDICIAL REVIEW OF WATER RIGHTS;
AUTHORIZING WATER COURT REVIEW OF CERTAIN DECISIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES AND CONSERVATION; CLARIFYING WATER COURT DUTIES; REPEALING SECTION 6,
CHAPTER 126, LAWS OF 2017; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”